Maryland, session 2025, HB0495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
26–706.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY” MEANS ANY POLICY,
PROCEDURE, PROTOCOL, OR GUIDELINE REGARDING EITHER OF THE FOLLOWING
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0495*

HOUSE BILL 495
TOPICS REGULATING INCIDENTS THAT OCCUR ON SCHOOL PREMISES, ON SCHOOL
TRANSPORTATION, OR AT A SCHOOL–SPONSORED, OFF–CAMPUS EVENT:
(I) BULLYING OR HARASSMENT BASED ON RACE, ETHNICITY,
COLOR, RELIGION, SEX, AGE, NATIONAL ORIGIN, MARITAL STATUS, SEXUAL
ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, OR ANY OTHER PROTECTED STATUS;
OR
(II) SEXUAL VIOLENCE, DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, DATING
VIOLENCE, OR STALKING.
(3) “FREQUENTLY ENCOUNTERED LANGUAGE” MEANS A LANGUAGE
THAT IS THE PRIMARY LANGUAGE SPOKEN BY:
(I) AT LEAST 5% OF THE POPULATION OF OVERALL STUDENTS
AND EMPLOYEES IN A SCHOOL; OR
(II) AT LEAST 5% OF THE POPULATION OF THE COUNTY OR AT
LEAST 1,000 PEOPLE IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH A SCHOOL IS LOCATED.
(4) “SCHOOL” MEANS:
(I) A PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM THAT RECEIVES STATE
FUNDING;
(II) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL; AND
(III) AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION.
(B) A SCHOOL THAT HAS ADOPTED AN ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY SHALL
ENSURE THAT THE POLICY INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) REPORTING OPTIONS FOR AN ALLEGED VICTIM OF SEXUAL
VIOLENCE OR ANY SEX–BASED CRIMINAL OFFENSE;
(2) A POINT OF CONTACT FOR THE SCHOOL WITH AN ACTIVELY
MONITORED E–MAIL ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE SCHOOL’S INVESTIGATION PROCESS AND
DISCIPLINARY PROCEEDINGS;

HOUSE BILL 495 3
(4) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM’S
INVESTIGATION AND ADJUDICATION PROCESS;
(5) POTENTIAL REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS THAT THE SCHOOL
MAY PROVIDE TO AN ALLEGED VICTIM;
(6) THE TELEPHONE NUMBER AND WEBSITE ADDRESS FOR THE
LOCAL, STATE, OR NATIONAL HOTLINE PROVIDING INFORMATION TO VICTIMS OF
SEXUAL VIOLENCE, THAT IS UPDATED PERIODICALLY; AND
(7) THE NAME AND LOCATION OF THE NEAREST MEDICAL FACILITY
WHERE AN INDIVIDUAL MAY HAVE A RAPE KIT ADMINISTERED BY A PROFESSIONAL
TRAINED IN SEXUAL ASSAULT FORENSIC MEDICAL EXAMINATION AND EVIDENCE
COLLECTION, INCLUDING AVAILABLE TRANSPORTATION OPTIONS AND FINANCIAL
RESOURCES.
(C) A SCHOOL’S ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY SHALL BE:
(1) WRITTEN IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT IS EASY TO UNDERSTAND
AND AGE APPROPRIATE;
(2) PRINTED IN A COLOR, SIZE, AND FONT THAT ENHANCES
READABILITY;
(3) AVAILABLE IN FREQUENTLY ENCOUNTERED LANGUAGES;
(4) AVAILABLE, BY REQUEST, THROUGH ORAL INTERPRETATION IN
LESS FREQUENTLY ENCOUNTERED LANGUAGES, TO ENSURE TIMELY AND
MEANINGFUL ACCESS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY;
AND
(5) COMPLIANT WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES
ACT.
(D) A SCHOOL THAT HAS ADOPTED AN ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY SHALL
MAKE THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY AVAILABLE TO STUDENTS, EMPLOYEES,
VOLUNTEERS, AND PARENTS OR GUARDIANS BY:
(1) (I) INCLUDING THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY IN ANY
HANDBOOK OR OTHER PUBLICATION DESCRIBING THE RULES, PROCEDURES, AND
STANDARDS OF CONDUCT FOR THE SCHOOL PROVIDED TO STUDENTS, EMPLOYEES,
VOLUNTEERS, OR PARENTS OR GUARDIANS EACH SCHOOL YEAR; OR

HOUSE BILL 495
(II) PROVIDING A WRITTEN COPY OF THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION
POLICY TO STUDENTS, EMPLOYEES, VOLUNTEERS, AND PARENTS OR GUARDIANS
EACH SCHOOL YEAR;
(2) DISTRIBUTING COPIES OF THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY
ELECTRONICALLY BY E–MAIL TO ALL ENROLLED STUDENTS AT LEAST ONE TIME
EACH SCHOOL YEAR;
(3) POSTING A COPY OF THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY AT
APPROPRIATE LOCATIONS ON THE SCHOOL’S CAMPUS AT ALL TIMES; AND
(4) POSTING THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY IN A PROMINENT
LOCATION ON:
(I) THE SCHOOL’S WEBSITE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE FROM THE
HOMEPAGE OF THE WEBSITE BY USE OF NOT MORE THAN THREE LINKS; AND
(II) THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S WEBSITE OR THE WEBSITE
OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION.
(E) (1) A SCHOOL SHALL PROVIDE MANDATORY TRAINING OR
PROGRAMMING TO STUDENTS ON ENROLLMENT OR EMPLOYEES ON EMPLOYMENT
REGARDING THE SCHOOL’S ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICIES.
(2) A TRAINING OR PROGRAM CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) FOR STUDENTS, BE CONDUCTED AT THE BEGINNING OF
EACH SCHOOL YEAR IN STUDENT CLASSES, A SCHOOL ASSEMBLY, STUDENT
ORIENTATION EVENTS, OR AT SIMILAR EVENTS; AND
(II) FOR EMPLOYEES, BE CONDUCTED WITHIN 4 WEEKS OF THE
FIRST DAY OF WORK AT A PARENT TEACHER ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION
MEETING, AND PUBLIC MEETINGS OF THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE, LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM OFFICE, OR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF AN
INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION.
(3) IF A SCHOOL DOES NOT HAVE SUFFICIENT RESOURCES TO
PROVIDE THE TRAINING OR PROGRAM REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SCHOOL SHALL COORDINATE WITH A COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION
WITH EXPERTISE RELATED TO THE ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY TO PROVIDE THE
TRAINING TO STUDENTS OR EMPLOYEES AT NO COST.

HOUSE BILL 495 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.